Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3403
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Nebraska Life, Sickness and Accident Insurance Policy Readability Act, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Director shall mean the Director of Insurance;

(2) Insurer shall mean any company, corporation, exchange, society, or association whether organized on the stock, mutual, assessment, or fraternal plan of insurance, which is authorized under the laws of this state to provide life insurance, sickness and accident insurance, credit life insurance, or credit accident and health insurance, including, but not limited to, fraternal benefit societies and health maintenance organizations; and

(3) Policy shall mean any contract of life insurance, sickness and accident insurance, credit life insurance, or credit accident and health insurance delivered or issued for delivery in this state by any insurer subject to the act.

Laws 1979, LB 415, § 3;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 232.